Nebraska, session 109, LB79.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB79 LB79
2025 2025
Section 1. (1) On motion of a defendant in a civil action involving
a commercial motor vehicle requiring a commercial driver's license, the
trial court shall dismiss from the civil action any claim of the
defendant's direct negligence if the defendant stipulates that at the
time of the event that caused the damages that are the subject of the
civil action all of the following are true:
(a) The person whose negligence is alleged to have caused the
damages was the defendant's employee or independent contractor; and
(b) The person whose negligence is alleged to have caused the
damages was acting within the course and scope of employment with the
defendant or acting as an independent contractor of the defendant.
(2) If a defendant makes the stipulations described in subsection
(1) of this section with respect to an employee or independent contractor
and the employee's or independent contractor's negligence is found to
have caused or contributed to causing the damages, the defendant's
liability in the civil action shall be adjudged solely on the basis of
the legal doctrine known as respondeat superior.
(3) For purposes of this section, commercial motor vehicle has the
same meaning as in section 60-316.
-2-